Utah statutes.
34-20a-9.   Board of arbitration -- Determination -- Final and binding -- Exception -- Expense.

The determination of the majority of the board of arbitration thus established shall be final and binding on all matters in dispute except in salary or wage matters which shall be considered advisory only. Each party shall pay one-half of the expense of arbitration.



Enacted by Chapter 102, 1975 General Session

